Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1343.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-100 of Title 43A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services
is hereby abolished.
B. All duties, powers, and responsibilities, including real and
personal property, including books, records, and funds controlled by
the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services shall
be transferred to the State Department of Corrections.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.

Req. No. 10225 Page 1

SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-10225 TJ 01/08/25


















Req. No. 10225 Page 2